Washington statutes.
RCW 36.48.090

Clerk's trust fund created—Deposits—Interest—Investments.

Whenever the clerk of the superior court has funds held in trust for any litigant or for any purpose, they shall be deposited in a separate fund designated "clerk's trust fund," and shall not be commingled with any public funds. However, in the case of child support payments, the clerk may send the checks or drafts directly to the recipient or endorse the instrument to the recipient and the clerk is not required to deposit such funds. In processing child support payments, the clerk shall comply with RCW 26.09.120. The clerk may invest the funds in any of the investments authorized by RCW 36.29.020. The clerk shall place the income from such investments in the county current expense fund to be used by the county for general county purposes unless: (1) The funds being held in trust in a particular matter are two thousand dollars or more, and (2) a litigant in the matter has filed a written request that such investment be made of the funds being held in trust. Interest income accrued from the date of filing of the written request for investment shall be paid to the beneficiary. In such an event, any income from such investment shall be paid to the beneficiary of such trust upon the termination thereof: PROVIDED, That five percent of the income shall be deducted by the clerk as an investment service fee and placed in the county current expense fund to be used by the county for general county purposes.

In any matter where funds are held in the clerk's trust fund, any litigant who is not represented by an attorney and who has appeared in matters where the funds held are two thousand dollars or more shall receive written notice of the provisions of this section from the clerk.

[ 1994 c 185 s 4; 1987 c 363 s 4; 1979 ex.s. c 227 s 1; 1977 c 63 s 1; 1973 c 126 s 8; 1963 c 4 s 36.48.090. Prior: 1933 ex.s. c 40 s 2; RRS s 5561-2.]